Otsuka Pharmaceutical Development & Commercialization, Inc. Investigational Medicinal Product Tolvaptan (OPC-41061) CLINICAL PROTOCOL A Phase 1, Open-label, Randomized, Parallel-arm Study to Determine the Pharmacokinetic and Pharmacodynamic Bioequivalence of Tolvaptan Extended-release (ER) Capsules and Tolvaptan Immediate-release (IR) Tablets and the Effect of a High-Fat Meal on Tolvaptan ER Capsule Pharmacokinetics in Healthy Adult Subjects Protocol No. 156-201-00387 IND No. 162351 CONFIDENTIAL  PROPRIETARY INFORMATION Sponsor: Otsuka Pharmaceutical Development & Commercialization, Inc. 2440 Research Boulevard Rockville, Maryland 20850, United States Immediately Reportable Event Parexel Phone: +1-781-434-5010 Fax: +1-781-434-5957 Email: NorthAmerica_Medical@parexel.com Approval: 07 Jul 2022   70  List of In-text Tables Table 1.3-1 Schedule of Assessments for Parts 1 and 2 19 Table 1.3-2 Schedule of Assessments for Part 3 22 Table 2.3-1 Trial Objectives and Endpoint(s) 27 Table 4.3-1 Dosing Schedule for Parts 1 and 2 30 Table 10.2-1 Clinical Laboratory Assessments 65  List of In-text Figures Figure 1.2-1 Trial Design Schematic: Part 1 Pilot and Part 2 Pivotal Bioequivalence Arm 1 (Low Dose Arm) 16 Figure 1.2-2 Trial Design Schematic: Part 1 Pilot and Part 2 Pivotal Bioequivalence Arm 2 (High Dose Arm) 17 Figure 1.2-3 Trial Design Schematic: Part 3 Food Effect 18 List of Abbreviations Abbreviation Definition ADPKD Autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease AE Adverse event AESI Adverse event of special interest AUC Area under the concentration-time curve AUC0-24h Area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to 24 hours postdose. AUC Area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to infinity AUCt Area under the concentration-time curve calculated to the last observable concentration at time t BE Bioequivalence BID Twice daily (or 2 times a day) BMI Body mass index C24h Concentration at 24 hours postdose CDER Center for Drug Evaluation and Research CFR Code of Federal Regulations CI(s) Confidence interval(s) CIOMS Council for International Organizations of Medical Science CL/F Apparent clearance of drug from plasma after extravascular administration Cmax Maximum (peak) plasma concentration of the drug CRF Case report form CRO Contract research organization CSR Clinical study report DNA Deoxyribonucleic acid ECG Electrocardiogram eCRF Electronic case report form EDC Electronic data capture eGFR Estimated glomerular filtration rate ER Extended-release ET Early termination FBR Future Biospecimen Research FDA Food and Drug Administration GCP Good Clinical Practice GMR(s) Geometric mean ratio(s) h Hours hCG Human chorionic gonadotropin HFM High-fat meal HIV Human immunodeficiency virus IB Investigator’s Brochure ICF Informed consent form ICH International Council for Harmonisation ICMJE International Committee of Medical Journal Editors IMP Investigational medicinal product  Abbreviation Definition IND Investigational New Drug IR Immediate-release IRB Institutional review board IRE Immediately reportable event K2EDTA Dipotassium ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid L Liter LPLV Last patient last visit MIDD Model-informed drug development PD Pharmacodynamic PE Physical examination PK Pharmacokinetic POCBP Persons of childbearing potential PQC Product quality complaint QD Once daily QRS Q wave, R wave and S wave RBC Red blood cell RNA Ribonucleic acid SAE Serious adverse event SoA Schedule of assessments TEAE Treatment-emergent adverse event TKV Total kidney volume tmax Time to maximum (peak) plasma concentration ULN Upper limit of normal Uosm Urine osmolality US or USA United States or United States of America V2 Vasopressin type 2 WBC White blood cell  1 Protocol Summary 1.1 Synopsis Name of Sponsor: Otsuka Pharmaceutical Development & Commercialization, Inc. Name of Investigational Medicinal Product: Tolvaptan (OPC-41061) Protocol No.: 156-201-00387 IND No.: 162351 Protocol Title: A Phase 1, Open-label, Randomized, Parallel-arm Study to Determine the Pharmacokinetic and Pharmacodynamic Bioequivalence of Tolvaptan extended-release (ER) Capsules and Tolvaptan immediate-release (IR) Tablets and the Effect of a High-Fat Meal on Tolvaptan ER Capsule Pharmacokinetics in Healthy Adult Subjects Protocol Lay Person Short Title: A Phase 1, Open-label Study to Determine the Similarity Between Tolvaptan ER Capsules and Tolvaptan IR Tablets and the Effect of a High-Fat Meal on Tolvaptan ER Capsules in Healthy Adult Subjects Clinical Phase: 1 Planned Treatment/Indication: Autosomal Dominant Polycystic Kidney Disease Rationale: Based on previous trials (Trials 156-09-285, 156-09-290), extended-release (ER) doses of 90 mg, 65 mg and 45 mg capsules are proposed to be bioequivalent to the commercially available 90/30 mg, 60/30 mg, and 45/15 mg twice daily dosage regimens of the immediate-release (IR) tablets (Jynarque® in the US; hereafter referred to as tolvaptan IR tablets). As dose proportional pharmacokinetics (PK) of tolvaptan have been observed for the tolvaptan range of 15 mg to 90 mg, bioequivalence will be evaluated for the 90 mg ER capsules compared to tolvaptan 90/30 mg IR tablets and for 45 mg ER capsules, compared to tolvaptan 45/15 mg IR tablets. A biowaiver will be sought for the 65 mg ER dose. Parts 1 and 2 of this trial will evaluate the bioequivalence of the ER capsules to the tolvaptan IR tablets in healthy subjects. As part of registering a new dosage form, the regulatory authority requires that the effect of drug administration immediately following a high-fat, high-calorie meal be determined for the highest dosage strength. Therefore, Part 3 of this trial will determine tolvaptan PK following single administration of the 90 mg ER capsule in the fasted state or immediately following a high-fat meal in healthy subjects.  Objectives and Endpoints: Objectives Endpoint(s) Primary: To determine the PK and PD bioequivalence of tolvaptan ER capsules and tolvaptan immediate-release tablets and to evaluate the effect of a high-fat meal on tolvaptan ER capsule PK in healthy adult subjects Primary: Part 1 and Part 2: PK: C24h, Cmax on Days 1 and 4 PD: Uosm AUC0-24h change-from-baseline Uosm AUC0-24h on Days -1, 1, and 4 Part 3: PK: Cmax, AUCt, AUC∞ on Days 1 and 4 Secondary: To assess the safety and tolerability of oral tolvaptan. Adverse events, clinical laboratory tests, vital signs, physical examinations, and ECGs. AUC0-24h = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to 24 hours postdose; AUCt = area under the concentration-time curve calculated to the last observable concentration at time t; AUC∞ = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to infinity; C24h = concentration at 24 hours postdose; Cmax = maximum (peak) plasma concentration of the drug; ECGs = electrocardiograms; PD = Pharmacodynamic; Uosm = urine osmolality. Trial Design: Parts 1 and 2 will be phase 1, open-label, randomized, parallel-arm studies to evaluate the bioequivalence of tolvaptan 45 mg extended-release (ER) capsules with 45/15 mg tolvaptan IR tablets, and 90 mg ER capsules with 90/30 mg tolvaptan IR tablets. Part 1 is the pilot bioequivalence part of the study, and Part 2 is the pivotal/definitive bioequivalence assessment part of the study. Eligible subjects will enter the study center on Day -3 prior to the start of dosing and will be confined to the research clinic through the completion of PK and urine sampling following the last dose of the investigational medicinal product (IMP) (total duration of 9 days in-clinic). Subjects will be placed on water restriction of 2 to 2.5 L on Days -2 and -1 prior to dosing and will be fasted prior to dosing. On Day 1, subjects in Arm 1 (low dose arm) will receive a single oral dose of tolvaptan 45 mg ER capsule or a split-dose of 45/15 mg tolvaptan IR tablets. Subjects in Arm 2 (high dose arm) will receive a single oral dose of tolvaptan 90 mg ER capsule or a split-dose of 90/30 mg tolvaptan IR tablets. On Day 3, subjects will be placed on water restriction, and receive a crossover dosage of tolvaptan on Day 4. Following the last dose of IMP on Day 4 and completion of PK and urine sampling, subjects will be discharged on Day 6, and a 7-day follow-up telephone call for assessment of adverse events will be conducted on Day 11 for treatment completers. Part 3 is a 2-period, open-label, randomized, crossover trial that will assess the effect of food (United States [US] Food and Drug administration [FDA]-defined High Fat Meal) on tolvaptan PK following dosing with the 90 mg ER capsule. Eligible subjects will enter the study center on Day -1 prior to dosing and will be confined to the research clinic through the completion of PK sampling following the last  dose of the IMP (total duration of 7 days in-clinic). On Days 1 and 4, fasting subjects will be dosed following a minimum 10-hour fast and no food will be allowed for 4 hours after the morning dose. In the fed state, subjects will be administered a 90 mg ER capsule within 30 minutes of the start of consuming a high-fat breakfast. Pharmacokinetic blood samples will be collected predose and for 48 hours postdose on Days 1 and 4. Trial Population: It is planned that 48 healthy adult subjects, 18 to 45 years of age (inclusive), will be enrolled in Part 1 of this trial. Even numbers of men and women should be enrolled, and one sex may not represent more than 75% of the total subjects. It is expected that 22 subjects will complete each arm of Part 1. The sample size in Part 2 of the trial will be based on the results of Part 1. In Part 3, 14 subjects will be enrolled. Even numbers of men and women should be enrolled, and one sex may not represent more than 75% of the total subjects. It is the expectation that 12 subjects will complete Part 3. Decisions to replace subjects will be made by the sponsor. Key Inclusion/Exclusion Criteria: Subjects (male and female at birth) between the ages of 18 and 45 years (inclusive), with a body mass index between 19 and 32 kg/m2 (inclusive), who are in good health as determined by medical history, physical examination, electrocardiogram (ECG), serum/urine chemistry, hematology, and serology tests, and who are able to provide informed consent will be considered for inclusion in the trial. Trial Site(s): The trial will be conducted in the United States of America (USA). Trial Intervention(s), Dose, Dosage Regimen, Treatment Duration, Formulation, Mode of Administration: Tolvaptan IR tablets will be provided as 15, 30, 45, and 90 mg Jynarque commercial tablets. Tolvaptan ER capsules will be provided as 45 and 90 mg capsules. All doses will be administered orally. For Parts 1 and 2, the IR tablets will be administered in split-dose regimens of 45/15 mg and 90/30 mg with the morning dose taken in the fasted state, and the second dose administered 8 hours later. The ER capsules will be administered in the fasted state as single doses of either 45 mg or 90 mg.  In Part 3, the tolvaptan 90 mg ER capsule will be dosed either in the fasted state or within 30 minutes of the start of consuming a high-fat, high-calorie meal in a 2-period, randomized, crossover design. Subjects dosed in the fasted state will be administered tolvaptan following a minimum 10-hour fast. Each dose will be administered with 240 mL of room temperature, still water. No water will be allowed from 1 hour prior to dosing until 2 hours after the morning dose. No food will be allowed for 4 hours after the morning dose. Trial Assessments: Assessments for PK: blood sampling for IMP plasma concentration on Days 1 and 4. Assessments for PD: Urine sampling for volume and osmolality. Assessments for Safety: adverse events, clinical laboratory tests, 12-lead ECG, vital signs, and physical examination findings. Screening/Other: medical and medication history, urine drug screening, and serum pregnancy test. Independent Data Monitoring Committee: No Statistical Methods: The statistical analyses will follow the principles for establishing average bioequivalence given in the FDA Guidance on statistical approaches for establishing bioequivalence between a test and reference formulation and to establish the bioequivalence of 2 treatments. For each parameter, due to the nature of the normal-theory confidence intervals (CIs), this comparison of the 90% CI to the equivalence limits is equivalent to carrying out two 1-sided tests of hypotheses, each at the 5% level of significance. An analysis of variance will be performed on the natural-log transformed PK parameters using the MIXED procedure in SAS. The mixed-effects linear model for each parameter will include sequence, treatment, and period as fixed effects, and a term for subjects as a random effect. From each analysis, least squares means, their difference, and the 90% CI for their difference will be derived. Then, the anti-logs of the difference and the confidence limits will provide the estimate and 90% CI for the ratio of the geometric means of the 2 dosage strengths or the 2 treatments (fed and fasted). For Parts 1 and 2, the following criteria for PK and urine osmolality (Uosm) are recommended to bridge the ER and IR formulations to be applied at both dose levels (ER 90 mg vs IR 90/30 mg, and ER 45 mg vs IR 45/15 mg).  • Lower bound of 90% CI of geometric mean ratio (GMR) for tolvaptan C24h ≥ 0.8 • Upper bound of 90% CI of GMR for tolvaptan Cmax ≤ 1.25 • Lower bound of 90% CI of GMR for AUC0-24h of Uosm change from baseline ≥ 0.8 • Upper bound of 90% CI of GMR for AUC0-24h of on-treatment Uosm ≤ 1.25 Non-inferiority of ER vs IR will be established if lower bounds of 90% CI of GMR for C24h and AUC0-24h of Uosm are ≥ 0.8 and upper bounds of 90% CI of GMR for Cmax and AUC0-24h of on-treatment Uosm are ≤ 1.25. Only subjects that have PK or Uosm parameters determined for both treatments will be included in the analysis. Trial Duration: Each subject in this trial is expected to participate in the following periods of the trial: Parts 1 and 2: • Eligibility screening period: 28 days (Day -28 to Day -1) • Check-in: 1 day (Day -3) • Treatment period: 6 days (Days 1 to 6) • Post-treatment follow-up: 7 (+2) days after last dose of IMP (Day 11 [+2]) Part 3: • Eligibility screening period: 28 days (Day -28 to Day -1) • Check-in: 1 day (Day -1) • Treatment period: 6 days (Days 1 to 6) • Post-treatment follow-up: 7 (+2) days after last dose of IMP (Day 11 [+2]) Overall, the expected duration for trial participation for each individual subject is 39 days. The trial start is defined as the date the first subject signs their informed consent form. Overall, the trial duration, from signing of the first subject’s informed consent form to the last subject’s final assessment, is expected to be 9 months. Known and Potential Risks and Benefits: Subjects will not derive any clinical benefit from the trial. Daily dosing of tolvaptan has been shown to be well tolerated in healthy subjects.  1.2 Schema L = liter. Figure 1.2-1 Trial Design Schematic: Part 1 Pilot and Part 2a Pivotal Bioequivalence Arm 1 (Low Dose Arm) a Subject number in Part 2 will be determined from the Part 1 results.  Figure 1.2-2 Trial Design Schematic: Part 1 Pilot and Part 2a Pivotal Bioequivalence Arm 2 (High Dose Arm) a Subject number in Part 2 will be determined from the Part 1 results.  HFM = high-fat meal. Figure 1.2-3 Trial Design Schematic: Part 3 Food Effect  Section 6.1  Section 8.5  DNA = deoxyribonucleic acid; FBR = future biospecimen research; FSH = follicle stimulating hormone; HIV = human immunodeficiency virus; IMP = investigational medicinal product; RNA = ribonucleic acid. aTelephone call will be 7 (+ 2) days after last dose of IMP. bIncludes a check of subject tolerability to water restriction. cSubjects who were female at birth only. A serum pregnancy test will be taken to confirm a positive urine pregnancy test. dPostmenopausal women only. eRandomization will be performed pre-IMP administration. fIR tablets will be administered as a split dose in the morning and afternoon (8 hours after the morning dose). The second dose of IR tablets will be administered immediately following the 8-hour PK blood sample collection. gVital signs will be assessed prior to IMP dosing. Blood pressure, heart rate, temperature, and respiratory rate will be measured after the subject has been supine for  3 minutes. hStandard 12-lead ECGs will be performed after the subject has been supine and at rest for  10 minutes prior to the ECG. iBlood samples for PK analysis will be collected on Days 1and 4 (predose and 0.5, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 16 hours postdose), Days 2 and 5 (24, 30, and 36 hours postdose), and Days 3 and 6 (48 hours postdose). jUrine samples will be collected at 0-4, 4-8, 8-12-, 12-16, and 16-24-hour intervals. kFBR DNA will be collected predose on Day 1 only. FBR RNA and plasma will be collected predose and 4, 8, and 24 hours postdose. FBR urine will be collected as part of the urine osmolality sample.  Section 6.1 SAFETY AND TOLERABILITY Record adverse events <-----------------------------------------------------------Ongoing-----------------------------------------------> Section 8.7 Record concomitant medications <-------------------------------------------------------------Ongoing---------------------------------------------> Section 6.6  Section 8.2.1 aTelephone call will be 7 (+ 2) days after last dose of IMP. bSubjects who were female at birth only. A serum pregnancy test will be taken to confirm a positive urine pregnancy test. cPostmenopausal women only. dRandomization will be performed pre-IMP administration. eIR tablets will be administered as a split-dose in the morning and afternoon (8 hours after the morning dose). The second dose of IR tablets will be administered immediately following the 8-hour PK blood sample collection. fVital signs will be assessed prior to IMP dosing. Blood pressure, heart rate, temperature, and respiratory rate will be measured after the subject has been supine for  3 minutes. gStandard 12-lead ECGs will be performed after the subject has been supine and at rest for  10 minutes prior to the ECG. h Blood samples for PK analysis will be collected on Days 1and 4 (predose and 0.5, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 16 hours postdose), Days 2 and 5 (24, 30, and 36 hours postdose), and Days 3 and 6 (48 hours postdose).  2 Introduction Tolvaptan (OPC-41061) is a selective, competitive arginine vasopressin type 2 (V2) receptor antagonist. Tolvaptan was approved in the United States (US) on 23 Apr 2018 to slow kidney function decline in adults at risk of rapidly progressing autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease (ADPKD). JYNARQUE® (tolvaptan) has been a major advancement in ADPKD treatment and remains the only disease-modifying therapy. However, aquaretic effects are a major barrier to initiating and maintaining tolvaptan treatment and impact patients’ activity of daily living. A once daily (QD) formulation that optimizes the pharmacokinetic (PK) profile is expected to lessen aquaretic effects and improve the tolerability of tolvaptan. This study will evaluate the PK and pharmacodynamic (PD) bioequivalence of tolvaptan extended-release (ER) capsules administered QD and tolvaptan immediate-release (IR) tablets administered twice daily (BID), and the effect of a high-fat meal on the highest dose strength tolvaptan ER capsule PK in healthy adult subjects. Please refer to the tolvaptan Investigator’s Brochure (IB) for more detailed information of the chemistry, pharmacology, efficacy, and safety of tolvaptan. 2.1 Trial Rationale Based on previous trials (Trials 156-09-285, 156-09-290), ER doses of 90 mg, 65 mg and 45 mg capsules are proposed to be bioequivalent to the commercially available 90/30 mg, 60/30 mg and 45/15 mg BID dosage regimens of the IR tablets (Jynarque® in the US; hereafter referred to as tolvaptan IR tablets). As dose proportional PK of tolvaptan have been observed for the IR dose range of 15 mg to 90 mg, bioequivalence will be evaluated for the 90 mg ER compared to 90/30 mg IR and for 45 mg ER, compared to 45/15 mg IR. A biowaiver will be sought for the 65 mg ER dose. The sample size to be used for a definitive bioequivalence study cannot be determined because the variability of tolvaptan PK and urine osmolality (Uosm) parameters following doses of the ER capsule and IR tablet given as a split-dose regimen has not been established. Previous bioequivalence studies conducted with single doses of the IR tablets required 30 to 44 subjects. Part 1 of this trial will be a 2-arm, pilot bioequivalence study, which will compare the 90 mg ER to 90/30 mg IR and 45 mg ER to 45/15 mg IR, each comparison using 24 healthy adult subjects. Part 2 will be a 2-arm, definitive bioequivalence study with the same study design as the pilot study.  As part of registering a new dosage form, the regulatory authority requires that the effect of drug administration immediately following a high-fat, high-calorie meal be determined for the highest dosage strength. Therefore, Part 3 of this trial will be a 2-period, open-label, randomized crossover design to determine tolvaptan PK following single administration of the 90 mg ER capsule in the fasted state or immediately following a high-fat meal in 14 healthy adult subjects. 2.3 Known and Potential Risks and Benefits In subjects with ADPKD, tolvaptan has been studied using surrogates of vasopressin action (eg, Uosm) and ADPKD disease progression (eg, total kidney volume [TKV] and estimated glomerular filtration rate [eGFR]). Tolvaptan can suppress arginine vasopressin action over 24 hours in most subjects when given in a BID regimen using the IR formulation, or with single-daily oral doses of ER formulations. When administered chronically, the TKV is initially reduced (as early as 1 week and for up to 2 months) after which the rate of TKV growth appears to be slowed when compared with historical controls (over 3 years). In these subjects, eGFR declines initially (weeks) and transiently, then stabilizes with a rate of decline, which again is less than that observed for historic controls (over 3 years). In a large phase 3 trial in subjects with ADPKD, tolvaptan treatment slowed the rate of TKV growth and renal function decline and reduced the risk of medically significant renal pain and dysfunction. The most notable safety issue associated with chronic tolvaptan use, which was identified in the Phase 3 Trial 156-04-251 (TEMPO 3:4), is the potential for idiosyncratic hepatic toxicity. With a once every 4-month monitoring scheme, an imbalance in the proportion of subjects with elevated transaminases (tolvaptan > placebo) led to the identification of 3 subjects (total from both Trial 156-04-251 and its open-label extension trial,  156-08-271) with laboratory and clinical evidence of potentially serious drug-induced liver injury. Based on the available data from the aforementioned ADPKD trials, standard liver parameters will be measured in this trial at screening, and on Day 6 prior to discharge. The treatment risks of tolvaptan in adults with ADPKD are well characterized and manageable. The most commonly observed risks of tolvaptan therapy in adults with ADPKD include those arising from aquaresis (eg, polyuria, pollakiuria, nocturia, thirst, dry mouth). Subjects should have appropriate access to drinking water. While aquaretic events did not contribute to significant subject morbidity over 3 years of study in the pivotal placebo-controlled ADPKD trial (Trial 156-04-251), they do represent adverse drug reactions which occur early (within days to weeks) and may limit a subject’s ability to continue therapy over a duration of treatment that is likely to provide benefit. These adverse events (AEs) and the above attributable adverse reactions should be considered in light of the potential benefit of delaying progression of ADPKD. In the final assessment, the overall benefit-risk profile of tolvaptan for the treatment of ADPKD appears favorable Controlled clinical and post-marketing experience with tolvaptan is primarily based on immediate-release formulations, administered in split dose regimen BID. But considering bioequivalence, the same safety profile applies to tolvaptan extended-release formulations. Previous studies showed that no relevant differences in safety profile were identified (Trial 156-09-285 and 156-09-290). One of the major barriers to initiating and maintaining patients on tolvaptan is the negative impact on patients’ lives due to aquaretic effects (thirst, polyuria, pollakiuria, and nocturia) associated with tolvaptan’s mechanism of action. A QD formulation of tolvaptan with an optimized PK profile (single peak, slower rise in concentrations, and lower peak-to-trough ratio) represents an opportunity to further improve patient treatment compliance by reducing the impact of aquaretic effects on patients’ quality of life and suggesting an improved risk/benefit profile. As of 18 May 2021, 9152 subjects have been exposed to at least one oral dose of tolvaptan in completed, terminated, or ongoing tolvaptan trials in the US, Europe, Argentina, China, and Japan. Of these, 1227 were healthy subjects. Additionally, 14 healthy subjects were exposed to a single 1 mg intravenous dose of tolvaptan in a phase 1 bioavailability trial (Trial 156-05-254) in the US. The most frequently reported treatment-emergent adverse events (TEAEs) (> 10%) in healthy subjects treated with tolvaptan were thirst, pollakiuria, and headache.  Subjects will not derive any benefit from the trial. Trial sites will receive updated versions of the IB 2, when available, and trial sites should refer to the most current version as needed. 3 Objectives and Endpoints Table 2.3-1 Trial Objectives and Endpoint(s) Objectives Endpoint(s) Primary: To determine the PK and pharmacodynamic (PD) bioequivalence of tolvaptan extended-release (ER) capsules and tolvaptan immediate-release tablets and to evaluate the effect of a high-fat meal on tolvaptan ER capsule PK in healthy adult subjects Primary: Part 1and Part 2: PK: C24h, Cmax on Days 1 and 4 PD: Uosm AUC0-24h change-from-baseline Uosm AUC0-24h on Days -1, 1, and 4 Part 3: PK: Cmax, AUCt, AUC∞ on Days 1 and 4 Secondary: To assess the safety and tolerability of oral tolvaptan. Adverse events, clinical laboratory tests, vital signs, physical examinations, and ECGs. AUC0-24h = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to 24 hours postdose; AUCt = area under the concentration-time curve calculated to the last observable concentration at time t; AUC∞ = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to infinity; C24h = concentration at 24 hours postdose; Cmax = maximum (peak) plasma concentration of the drug; ECGs = electrocardiograms; Uosm = urine osmolality. Section 9.4 describes the statistical analysis of the endpoints for the primary and key secondary endpoints. 4 Trial Design 4.1 Type/Design of Trial 4.1.1 Parts 1 and 2 (Bioequivalence) Part 1 is an open-label, randomized, parallel-arm pilot trial that will assess the bioequivalence of tolvaptan 90 mg ER capsules to tolvaptan IR 90/30 mg tablets, and 45 mg ER capsules to 45/15 mg IR tablets in 48 healthy adult subjects. In a 2-period, randomized, parallel design, investigational medicinal product (IMP) will be administered as either QD ER capsule or IR tablets in a split-dose (BID) for a single day. Twenty-four subjects each will be allocated to Arm 1 (low dose arm) or Arm 2 (high dose arm) of the study. In Arm 1 (low dose arm), subjects will be randomized to receive either 45 mg ER capsule or 45/15 mg IR tablet, and in Arm 2 (high dose arm), subjects will be randomized to receive either 90 mg ER capsule or 90/30 mg IR tablets on Day 1. On Day 4, subjects will receive the corresponding ER or IR dosing regimen. Part 1 is the pilot bioequivalence part of the study, and Part 2 is the pivotal/definitive bioequivalence  assessment part of the study. The trial design schematics are presented in Figure 1.2-1 and Figure 1.2-2 for Parts 1 and 2. Baseline urine volume and osmolality assessments will be determined on the day prior to the start of IMP. Tolvaptan concentrations will be assessed for 48 hours following the dose of each IMP (Days 1 and 4). Urine volume and osmolality assessments will be assessed at baseline (Day -1) and 24 hours following the dose of each IMP (Days 1 and 4). Subjects will have a screening period of up to 28 days and return to the clinic on Day -3 for water restriction of 2 to 2.5 L (2 L fluid intake plus water in food) on Day -2. Eligible subjects will stay in the clinic for baseline assessment and another day of water restriction on Day -1 (1 day before their first dose of tolvaptan). Two-hundred and forty milliliters of water will be administered at the planned dosing time for Days 1 and 4. Subjects will be confined to the clinic unit from Day -3 through completion of PK and urine sampling following the last dose. Following the last dose of IMP, a 7-day follow-up telephone call for assessment of AEs will be conducted on Day 11 (+2) for treatment completers. Participation in this trial will be for a planned total of 39 days, including screening, treatment, and follow-up periods. The decision to proceed to Part 2 of the study will be dependent on the PK/PD data arising from Part 1 of the study. Screening for Part 2 of the study may proceed while data from Part 1 is being evaluated. However, subjects will not be randomized until the PK/PD data evaluation from Part 1 is completed, and a sample size determination can be made for Part 2. The sample size for Part 2 will be based the variability of tolvaptan peak plasma concentrations (Cmax) and 24-hour postdose concentrations (C24h) as well as change-from-baseline and on-treatment Uosm AUC0-24h in Part 1, with additional subjects added for expected dropouts. 4.1.2 Part 3 (Food Effect) Part 3 is an open-label, randomized, crossover trial that will assess the effect of food (FDA-defined High Fat Meal [HFM]) on tolvaptan PK following administration of the 90 mg ER capsule. Fourteen subjects will be enrolled for a two period, single-dose, randomized crossover study with a 72-hour washout between doses. On Day 1, 7 subjects will be administered a 90 mg ER capsule in the fasted state, and 7 subjects will be administered a 90 mg ER capsule within 30 minutes of the start of consuming a HFM. On Day 4, the crossover will  be completed with subjects who received IMP in the fasted state on Day 1 receiving their dose after a HFM, and subjects who received a HFM on Day 1 receiving their dose in the fasted state. Pharmacokinetic blood samples will be collected for 48 hours postdose on Days 1 and 4. In the fed state, subjects will be administered a 90 mg ER capsule within 30 minutes of the start of consuming a HFM according to the FDA guidance for food-effect availability.3 The meal should be consumed within 20 minutes. The HFM will consist of the following: 2 eggs fried in butter 2 strips of bacon 2 slices of toast with butter 4 oz of hash brown potatoes 8 oz of whole milk Fat accounts for approximately 50% of total calories. Approximately 150, 250, and 500 to 600 calories are from protein, carbohydrates, and fat, respectively.3 Lunch will be given after the 4-hour assessment. Additional water will be available ad libitum except for 1 hour predose and 2 hours postdose around dosing. 4.2 Scientific Rationale for Trial Design For the treatment of ADPKD, tolvaptan is administered BID in split-dose regimens of 45/15, 60/30 and 90/30 mg; the first dose is taken in the morning and the second is taken approximately 8 hours later. Tolvaptan administration increases urine volume and reduces Uosm. Urine osmolality may serve as a bridging biomarker for tolvaptan inhibition of the V2 receptor, the mechanism of action for tolvaptan efficacy in treatment of ADPKD. A formulation of tolvaptan that could be administered QD was developed. While the concentration time profile only exhibits a single peak, the suppression of Uosm over the daily dosing interval is very similar to that produced by IR tablets. Therefore, this study will evaluate the bioequivalence of both tolvaptan plasma concentrations and area under the curve for Uosm. Further information regarding the rationale for this trial is presented in Section 2.1. 4.3 Dosing Rationale 4.3.1 Parts 1 and 2 Based on the previous trials (Trials 156-09-285 and 156-09-290), ER doses of 90 mg, 65 mg and 45 mg are proposed to be bioequivalent to the 90/30 mg, 60/30 mg and  45/15 mg BID dosage regimens of the IR tablet. As dose proportional PK of tolvaptan have been observed for the IR dose range of 15 mg to 90 mg, bioequivalence will be evaluated for the 90 mg ER compared to 90/30 mg IR and for 45 mg ER compared to 45/15 mg IR. Approval based on PK and PD bioequivalence is acceptable to the regulatory authorities based on model-informed drug development (MIDD) meetings conducted in October 2021 and March 2022. In the meeting preliminary comments, it was proposed that it is more sensitive to detect the differences in tolvaptan PK and Uosm between 2 formulations following a one-day treatment than at steady state following 5 days of treatment. Thus, doses are given for single day for each period in this trial. Dosing regimens to be administered in Parts 1 and 2 are presented in Table 4.3-1. Table 4.3-1 Dosing Schedule for Parts 1 and 2 Dosing Schedule Study Day Arm 1 (Low Dose arm) Arm 2 (High Dose arm) 1 IR 45/15 mg morning and 8 h later 45 mg ER, morning ER 90 mg, morning IR 90/30 mg, morning and 8 h later 4 45 mg ER, morning IR 45/15 mg morning and 8 h later IR 90/30 mg, morning and 8 h later ER 90 mg, morning h = hours. 4.3.2 Part 3 As part of the registration of a new dosage form, the regulations require that the effect of drug administration immediately following a high-fat, high-calorie meal be determined for the highest dosage strength, which is 90 mg for the ER capsule. Therefore, a 90 mg oral ER tolvaptan capsule will be administered with 240 mL of room temperature water in either the fasted state (fasting for a minimum of 10 hours) or within 30 minutes of the start of consuming a HFM.3 4.4 Start and End-of-Trial Definitions The trial start is defined as the first visit of the first subject, which is the date the first subject, or parent/legal guardian, signs their informed consent form. The end-of-trial date is defined as the last date of contact, or the date of final contact attempt as recorded on the post-treatment follow-up electronic case report form (eCRF) page for the last subject completing or withdrawing from the trial.  4.5 Definition of Completed Subjects 5 Trial Population It is planned that 48 healthy adult subjects will be enrolled in Part 1 of the trial. Even numbers of men and women should be enrolled; one sex may not represent more than 75% of the total subjects. Separate randomization codes will be generated by sex. It is the expectation that 22 subjects will complete each arm of Part 1. The number of subjects to be enrolled in the Part 2 pivotal bioequivalence part of the study will be determined based on the variability of tolvaptan Cmax and C24h, and the change-from-baseline and on-treatment Uosm AUC0-24h in Part 1, with additional subjects added for expected dropouts. It is expected that the sample size will not exceed 120 subjects (60 subjects in each arm). Fourteen subjects will be enrolled in Part 3, with the expectation that 12 subjects will complete the trial. Subjects who do not complete PK assessments through Day 6 of Parts 1 and 2, or Day 6 of Part 3 may be replaced at the discretion of the sponsor. 5.1 Subject Selection and Numbering At Screening, subjects will be assigned a unique subject identification number upon signing the informed consent form (ICF) starting at S0001, based on sequential enrollment into the trial. Since separate randomization codes will be generated for each sex, in Part 1, male (at birth) subjects will be assigned a randomization code sequentially beginning at 0001 and female (at birth) subjects will be assigned a randomization code sequentially beginning at 0101; in Part 2, male (at birth) subjects will be assigned a randomization code sequentially beginning at 0201 and female (at birth) subjects will be assigned a randomization code sequentially beginning at 0301. The clinical site will maintain a list identifying all subjects by their subject identification number and initials. Recruitment of replacements for noncompleters will be at the discretion of the sponsor. Replacement subjects will follow the same randomization scheme as the subjects they are replacing. The replacement subject will be assigned a randomization code that is 1000 plus the subject number of the replaced subject (ie, Subject 1012 will replace Subject 0012). Demographic information (collection date, date of birth, sex at birth, gender identification, childbearing potential, race, ethnicity) and medical history will be recorded in the eCRF at the screening visit.  Results of the eligibility assessment, date of randomization (or date of treatment assignment), and randomization number (or treatment group) will be recorded in the eCRF. 5.2 Eligibility Criteria Exceptions for eligibility criteria will not be permitted during the trial, neither by the investigator nor by the medical monitor. 5.2.1 Inclusion Criteria Subjects are required to meet the following inclusion criteria when assessed: 1) Subjects (male or female at birth) between 18 and 45 years of age, inclusive. 2) Must have a body mass index (BMI) between 19.0 to 32.0 kg/m2 (inclusive). 3) eGFR ≥ 90 mL/min*1.73 m2 4) Must be in good health as determined by medical history, physical examination, electrocardiogram (ECG), serum/urine biochemistry, hematology, and serology tests. 5) Ability to provide written, informed consent prior to initiation of any trial-related procedures, and ability, in the opinion of the principal investigator, to comply with all the requirements of the trial. 6) Sexually active subjects who are practicing 2 different methods of birth control during the trial and for 30 days after the last dose of trial medication or who will remain abstinent during the trial and for 30 days after the last dose, or sexually active persons of childbearing potential who are practicing 2 different methods of birth control during the trial and for 30 days after the last dose of trial medication or who will remain abstinent during the trial and for 30 days after the last dose, or persons of non-childbearing potential (surgically sterile or postmenopausal [confirmed by FSH testing]). If employing birth control, 2 of the following precautions must be used: vasectomy, tubal ligation, intrauterine device, birth control pill, birth control implant, birth control depot injection, birth control patch, condom with spermicide, sponge with spermicide, occlusive cap (vaginal diaphragm or cervical/vault cap) with spermicide.  5.2.2 Exclusion Criteria Subjects will be excluded if they meet any of the following exclusion criteria when assessed: 1) Clinically significant abnormality in past medical history, or at the Screening physical examination, that in the investigator’s or sponsor’s opinion may place the subject at risk or interfere with outcome variables including absorption, distribution, metabolism, and excretion of drug. This includes, but is not limited to, history of or concurrent cardiac, hepatic, renal, neurologic, endocrine, gastrointestinal, respiratory, hematologic, and immunologic disease. 2) History of drug and/or alcohol abuse within 2 years prior to Screening. 3) History of or current hepatitis or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome or carriers of hepatitis B surface antigen, hepatitis-C antibodies, and/or HIV antibodies. 4) History of any significant drug allergy. 5) A positive urine alcohol test and/or urine drug screen for substance of abuse at Screening or upon Check-in to the trial site. 6) Subjects having taken an investigational drug within 30 days preceding trial entry. 7) Any history of significant bleeding or hemorrhagic tendencies. 8) A history of difficulty in donating blood. 9) The donation of blood or plasma within 30 days prior to dosing. 10) Consumption of alcohol and/or food and beverages containing methylxanthines, grapefruit, grapefruit juice, pomelo, Seville oranges, or Seville orange juice within 72 hours prior to dosing. 11) Use of prescription, over-the-counter, herbal medication, or vitamin supplements within 14 days prior to dosing and antibiotics within 30 days prior to dosing. The sponsor may allow exceptions only if the medication’s administration is deemed unlikely to impact the PK or PD result. COVID-19 vaccines are accepted concomitant medication. 12) Exposure to any substances known to stimulate hepatic microsomal enzymes within 30 days prior to Screening (eg, occupational exposure to pesticides, organic solvents). 13) Use of tobacco products or daily exposure to second-hand smoke within 2 months prior to Screening, urine cotinine concentrations > 200 ng/mL, or serum cotinine concentrations > 20 ng/mL at Screening or at Check-in. 14) Subjects who have supine blood pressure, after resting for  3 minutes, higher than 140/80 mmHg or lower than 100/50 mmHg. The sponsor may allow exceptions if they are not deemed clinically significant. 15) Subjects who have a supine pulse rate, after resting for  3 minutes, outside the range of 40 to 90 beats per minute. The sponsor may allow exceptions if they are not deemed clinically significant. 16) Subjects who have clinically relevant changes on ECG such as atrioventricular block (ie, PR > 220 msec), prolongation of the QRS complex over 120 msec, or a  QT interval corrected for heart rate using Fridericia’s formula interval ≥ 450 msec. 17) History of serious mental disorders that, in the opinion of the investigator, would exclude the subject from participating in this trial. 18) Any subject who, in the opinion of the investigator, should not participate in the trial. 19) Subjects of childbearing potential who become pregnant prior to receiving IMP. 20) Previous exposure to tolvaptan. 21) Subjects who do not have a permanent physical residence in the US. 22) Subjects who cannot tolerate water restriction on Day -2 of the trial (Part 1and 2 only). 23) Subjects who cannot consume FDA-defined high fat meal (Part 3 only). 5.3 Lifestyle Considerations 5.3.1 Meals and Dietary Restrictions In Parts 1 and 2, subjects will be placed on water restriction to 2 to 2.5 L including fluid consumed as part of food on Days -2, -1, and 3. Foods consumed on these study days should not consist primarily of water (eg, soups, gelatin). Water may include non-caffeinated, non-sparkling, no-sugar added beverages (decaf tea, coffee, use of water flavoring agents, eg, Mio). Subjects will be given 240 mL of room temperature, still water at the expected time of dosing on Days 1 and 4, and then will be restricted to 1760 to 2260 mL for the rest of the day. There will be no water restriction on Days 1, 2, 4, 5, and 6. In Part 3, subjects dosed in the fed state will consume a high-fat, high-calorie breakfast prior to tolvaptan administration. No food will be allowed for 4 hours after the morning dose. Except as part of the dosing procedure, water will be restricted from 1 hour prior to dosing until 2 hours postdose. All subjects treated in the fasted state in the trial will be administered tolvaptan following a minimum 10-hour fast. 5.3.2 Caffeine, Alcohol, and Tobacco The use of alcohol as well as food and beverages containing methylxanthines (caffeinated coffee, caffeinated tea, caffeinated soda, and chocolate) within 72 hours prior to dosing and during the trial is prohibited. 5.3.3 Physical Activity Subjects will remain either in a seated or semi-recumbent position for the first 4 hours following the morning dosing except during brief periods where protocol-related  procedures need to be performed. Restroom visits must be supervised during the 4 hours postdose and should be brief (< 10 minutes). In addition, during the 4-hour period post oral dosing, the subject’s toilet use must be supervised to prevent self-induced emesis resulting in loss of the oral dose. Following the 4-hour postdose period, the subjects will be allowed to ambulate, but should not exercise strenuously. 5.4 Screen Failures A screen failure is a subject from whom informed consent is obtained and is documented in writing (ie, subject signs an ICF), but who is not randomized or assigned trial intervention(s). All AEs must be reported after subject informed consent has been obtained, including screen failures due to AEs, irrespective of trial intervention administration. If the subject meets the definition of a screen failure in this trial, the following information will be recorded in the eCRF: • Date of ICF signature • Visit date (screening visit) • Demographics (collection date, birth date, sex, race, ethnicity) • Result of eligibility assessment • Screen failure date • Reason for screen failure • Any AEs Subjects excluded for positive drug/alcohol screen are not eligible to be rescreened for participation in the trial. However, subjects excluded for any other reasons may be rescreened at any time if the exclusion characteristic has changed. If a subject is rescreened for trial participation and the rescreening is not completed within the original screening window, a new ICF must be signed. Rescreened subjects should also be assigned a new subject number for every screening/rescreening event. 6 Trial Intervention(s) and Concomitant Therapy 6.1 Trial Intervention(s) Administered Trial interventions are all pre-specified, IMPs intended to be administered to the subjects during the conduct of the trial. For Parts 1 and 2, the IR tablets will be administered in split-dose regimens of 45/15 mg and 90/30 mg with the morning dose taken in the fasted state, and the second dose administered 8 hours later. The ER capsule will be administered in the fasted state as single doses of either 45 mg or 90 mg.  In Part 3, the tolvaptan 90 mg ER capsule will be dosed either in the fasted state or within 30 minutes of the start of consuming a high-fat, high-calorie meal. Subjects dosed in the fasted state will be administered tolvaptan following a minimum 10-hour fast. Each dose will be administered with 240 mL of room temperature, still water. No water will be allowed from 1 hour prior to dosing until 2 hours postdose. No food will be allowed for 4 hours after the morning dose. For information regarding the dosage regimen and treatment period(s), including any follow-up period(s) for each treatment group/arm of the trial, see Section 4.1. 6.2 Management of Investigational Medicinal Product 6.2.1 Packaging and Labeling Tolvaptan IR tablets will be supplied as 15, 30, 45, and 90 mg commercial tablets. Tolvaptan ER capsules will be supplied as 45 and 90 mg capsules. The IMP will be provided by the sponsor or designated agent to the investigators and the persons designated by the investigator(s) or institution(s). The IMP will be supplied as packages. Each package used in the dosing period will be labeled to clearly disclose the compound ID, trial number, sponsor’s name and address, instructions for use, route of administration, and appropriate precautionary statements. 6.2.2 Storage The IMP will be stored in a securely locked cabinet or enclosure. Access will be limited to investigators and their designees. Neither investigators nor any designees may provide IMP to any subject not participating in this protocol. The IMP will be stored according to the conditions indicated on the IMP label. The clinical site staff will maintain a temperature log in the drug storage area recording the temperature at least once each working day. 6.2.3 Accountability The investigator or designee must maintain an inventory record of IMP received, dispensed, administered, and returned. Neither the investigator nor any designees may provide IMP to any subject not participating in this trial. The investigator must also ensure that the IMP is used only in accordance with the approved protocol.  6.2.4 Returns and Destruction The IMP may only be destroyed by the trial site(s), if approved by the sponsor and if the IMP destruction meets all local regulations. The IMP will be destroyed by the clinical trial site following completion and verification of accountability of the IMP by the assigned trial monitor. The trial site(s) may utilize qualified third-party vendors for IMP destruction. A certificate of destruction should be filed within the IMP accountability. 6.2.5 Reporting of Product Quality Complaints A Product Quality Complaint (PQC) is any written, electronic, or oral communication provided by a healthcare professional, consumer, clinical trial subject, medical representative, regulatory agency, partner, or other third party that alleges deficiencies related to the identity, quality, durability, reliability, safety, effectiveness, or performance of a medical device or medicinal product or a falsified, tampered, or diverted product after it is released for distribution. Examples include, but are not limited to, communications involving: • Failure/malfunction of a medicinal product or medical device to meet any of its specifications • Incorrect or missing labeling • Packaging issues (eg, damaged, dirty, crushed, missing product) • Blister defects (eg, missing, empty blisters) • Product defect (eg, odor, chipped, broken, embossing illegible) • Loss or theft of product 6.2.5.1 Eliciting and Reporting Product Quality Complaints The investigator or designee must record each PQC identified through any means from the receipt of the trial intervention(s) from the sponsor or sponsor’s designee, through and including reconciliation and up to destruction, including subject dosing. The investigator or designee must notify the sponsor (or sponsor’s designee) within 24 hours of becoming aware of the PQC according to the procedure outlined below: Send PQC reporting information to the Otsuka Pharmaceutical Development and Commercialization IMP PQC mailbox email: IMP-PQC@otsuka-us.com. Also indicate whether or not the complaint sample is available for return. Identification of a PQC by the subject should be reported to the site investigator, who should then follow the reporting mechanism above.  6.2.5.2 Information Required for Reporting Purposes • Description of complaint • Reporter identification (eg, subject, investigator, site, etc) • Reporter’s contact information (eg, address, phone number, e-mail address) • ID of material (product/compound name, coding) • Clinical protocol reference (number and/or trial name) • Dosage form/strength (if known) • Pictures of complaint sample (if available) • Availability of complaint sample for return • Was any subject at risk due to the identified issue? 6.2.5.3 Return Process Indicate during the report of the PQC if the complaint sample is available for return. If the complaint sample is available for return, the sponsor will provide return instructions, when applicable. It must be documented in the site accountability record that the complaint sample for a dispensed kit has been forwarded to the sponsor for complaint investigation. 6.2.5.4 Assessment/Evaluation Assessment and evaluation of PQCs will be handled by the sponsor. 6.2.6 Investigational Medicinal Product Reserve Sample Requirements In order to comply with FDA regulations, the trial site must maintain sufficient reserve samples of the IMP to conduct full analytical testing 5 times (5 ×). This reserve sample requirement is applicable to each shipment of IMP received at the trial site. Each shipment of IMP sent to the trial site will contain IMP to be used for conduct of the trial, as well as 5 × reserve samples. The trial site will randomly select the IMP containers to be used in the trial and will designate the remaining containers as reserve samples. The trial site must store the reserve samples per the clinical label storage condition requirements for a period of at least 5 years after marketing approval, or, if marketing approval is not obtained, at least 5 years following the date of completion of the bioequivalence trial unless FDA representatives collect the reserve samples for testing. The amount of IMP required for 5 × analytical testing is as follows: • 150 units x 5 years = 750 units for each dose strength  6.3 Measures to Minimize/Avoid Bias This trial is open-label. Subjects will be assigned to a treatment sequence in a randomized fashion on Day 1 following confirmation of inclusion and exclusion criteria. Subjects will be assigned to study treatment via IRT according to a computer-generated randomization scheme provided by the sponsor. 6.4 Subject Compliance The time and dose of each IMP administration will be recorded on the source documents and on the case report form (CRF). Information regarding any missed or inappropriately administered doses will also be documented on the source document and on the CRF. Compliance will be ensured by a mouth check during the oral dosing administration. 6.5 Dose Modification No dose modification is allowed. 6.6 Prior/Concomitant Medications or Therapies The investigator will record all medications (including, but not limited to, prescription medications, over-the-counter medications, vitamins, herbal remedies, etc) and therapies taken by the subject within 30 days of signing of informed consent through the end of the evaluation period (defined as the time period during which subjects are evaluated for primary objectives) in the eCRF. The investigator will also record all medications and therapies taken by the subject for treatment of an AE or which caused an AE until the end of the trial (defined as the last date of contact or date of final contact attempt) in the eCRF. COVID-19 vaccines are accepted concomitant medications. It is preferable for subjects not to receive the vaccine within 7 to 10 days prior to any administration of IMP, where possible so that, by the time of dosing, any effects of the vaccines (eg, pyrexia, fatigue, pain/stiffness at site of injection) are likely to have abated; however, subjects may not be excluded on this basis. For concomitant medications, the following will be recorded in the eCRF: medication, indication, dose, frequency, route, start date and end date. For concomitant therapy, the following will be recorded in the eCRF: therapy, indication, start date and end date. 6.6.1 Prohibited Medications or Therapies No medications other than the protocol-specific trial interventions may be taken during the trial. The use of prescription, over-the-counter, or herbal medications or vitamin  supplements within 14 days prior to dosing and antibiotics within 30 days prior to dosing is prohibited. The sponsor may allow exceptions only if the medication is unlikely to affect the PK or pharmacodynamic (PD) result. 6.6.2 Other Restrictions As stated in the exclusion criteria, consumption of grapefruit, grapefruit products, pomelo, Seville oranges, or Seville orange juice within 72 hours prior to dosing and during the trial is prohibited. 6.7 Intervention After the End of the Trial Not applicable. 7 Discontinuation of Trial/Treatment and Subject Discontinuation/Withdrawal 7.1 Entire Trial or Treatment If the sponsor terminates or suspends the trial for any reason, prompt notification will be given to investigators, Institutional Review Boards (IRBs), and regulatory authorities in accordance with regulatory requirements. 7.2 Individual Site Discontinuation Individual trial site participation may be discontinued by the sponsor, the investigator, or the IRB if judged to be necessary for medical, safety, regulatory, ethical, or other reasons consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and Good Clinical Practice (GCP). The investigator will notify the sponsor promptly if the investigator or the IRB at the site discontinues participation in the trial. 7.3 Discontinuation of Trial Intervention Under certain circumstances, it may be necessary for a subject to permanently discontinue trial intervention. If trial intervention is permanently discontinued, the subject should, if at all possible, remain in the trial to be evaluated for safety assessments. See the schedule of assessments (SoA) for data to be collected at the time of discontinuation of trial intervention and follow-up and for any further evaluations that need to be completed. If a subject discontinues trial intervention due to an AE, the investigator, or other trial personnel, will make every effort to follow the event until it has resolved or stabilized. For each subject who discontinues trial intervention, the main reason for discontinuation will be recorded in the eCRF (refer to Section 7.4.1).  7.4 Subject Discontinuation/Withdrawal from the Trial • A subject may withdraw from the trial at any time at the subject’s own request for any reason (or without providing any reason). • A subject may be withdrawn at any time at the discretion of the investigator for safety or compliance reasons. • At the time of discontinuing from the trial, if possible, an early termination (ET) visit should be conducted, as shown in the SoA. See SoA for data to be collected at the time of trial discontinuation and follow-up and for any further evaluations that need to be completed. • If a subject withdraws consent from the trial, the subject will be permanently discontinued from all trial interventions and the trial. • If the subject withdraws consent for disclosure of future information, the sponsor may retain and continue to use any data collected before the withdrawal of consent. • If a subject withdraws from the trial, the subject may request destruction of any samples taken and not tested, and the investigator must document this in the site trial records. Complete withdrawal of consent requires a subject’s refusal of ALL of the following methods of follow-up: • Participation in all follow-up procedures specified in the protocol (whether in-clinic, by telephone, or by a home visit). • Participation in a subset of protocol-specified follow-up procedures (by a frequency schedule and method, as agreed by subject and trial site staff). • Contact of the subject by trial site staff, even if only by telephone, to assess current medical condition, and obtain necessary medical or laboratory reports relevant to the trial’s objectives. • Contact of alternative person(s) who have been designated in source records as being available to discuss the subject’s medical condition, even if only by telephone, mail, or e-mail (eg, family, spouse, partner, legal representative, friend, neighbor, or physician). • Access to medical information from alternative sources (eg, hospital/clinic medical records, referring doctor’s notes, public records, dialysis, transplantation or vital registries, social media sources). Withdrawal of consent is a critical trial event and, therefore, should be approached with the same degree of importance and care as is used in initially obtaining informed consent. The reasons for a subject’s intended withdrawal need to be completely understood, documented, and managed to protect the rights of the subject and the integrity of the trial. A subject may initially express their desire to interrupt or discontinue trial intervention administration, which is not equivalent to a complete withdrawal of consent for further participation (see Section 7.3). A subject may, however, indicate that further trial participation is creating a burden on their work, school, or social schedule. Therefore, the  investigator should follow the procedures outlined in Section 7.4.2 to determine if the subject can continue participation in the trial if modifications to his/her treatment and/or schedule of assessments can be accommodated. Only subjects who withdraw their permission for all of the above methods of follow-up are considered to have completely withdrawn their consent to participate in the trial. 7.4.1 Documenting Reasons for Subject Discontinuation/Withdrawal A subject may discontinue trial intervention(s) or withdraw from the trial for the reasons listed below: • AE – Continuing IMP places the subject at undue risk as determined by the investigator (eg, a safety concern that is possibly, probably, or likely related to IMP) – Serious adverse event (SAE) – Other potentially IMP-related safety concerns or AEs • Death • Lost to follow-up • Noncompliance with study drug • Physician decision • Pregnancy • Protocol deviation • Protocol-specific withdrawal criterion met • Site terminated by sponsor • Withdrawal by subject • Trial terminated by sponsor • Technical problems • Other 7.4.2 Options for Continued Trial Participation In all cases of impending trial intervention discontinuation or consent withdrawal, investigators will be instructed to meet and discuss (without undue coercion) with the subject. Subjects who withdraw consent or discontinue IMP will be discontinued from the trial. The investigator should ensure understanding and documentation of the reasons for the subject’s desire to withdraw consent or discontinue IMP administration.  7.5 Lost to Follow-up Subjects who cannot be contacted for the 7-day follow-up telephone call after the treatment period, and who do not have a known reason for discontinuation (eg, withdrew consent or AE), and for whom a survival status at the end of the trial cannot be determined will be classified as “lost to follow-up.” Survival status can be determined from a variety of sources, either by obtaining acceptable documentation for death (ie, death certificate, medical records, public records, statement by a family member or primary care physician) or acceptable documentation for life (ie, direct contact with the subject, medical records, successful telephone contact with the subject, statement by a family member or primary care physician, or public records). The site will make 3 documented attempts to contact the subject by telephone and in the event the site is unable to reach the subject by telephone, the site will attempt to contact the subject via certified mail or an alternative similar method, where appropriate, before assigning a “lost to follow-up” status. If the subject was classified as “lost to follow-up,” the following information will be recorded in the eCRF: “Date of final contact attempt” and “Contact method.” 8 Trial Procedures Participation in this trial will be for a total of 39 days, including Screening, In-clinic, and Follow-up periods. In Parts 1 and 2, subjects will provide consent and be screened between Days -28 and -2 prior to dosing. Subjects who meet the inclusion criteria and do not fulfill any of the exclusion criteria will return to the trial center on Day -3 (Check-in). Subjects will be assigned a unique randomization code on Day 1. Subjects will remain in the trial center through Day 6, when they will be discharged. Subjects who terminate early should complete the Day 6 assessments at the time of termination. In Part 3, subjects will provide consent and be screened between Days -28 and Day -1 prior to dosing. Subjects who meet the inclusion criteria and do not fulfil any of the exclusion criteria will return to the trial center on Day -1 (Check-in). Subjects will be assigned a unique randomization code on Day 1. Subjects will remain in the trial center through Day 6, when they will be discharged. Subjects who terminate early should complete the Day 6 assessments at the time of termination. In all parts of the trial, a safety follow-up telephone contact will be performed 7 (+ 2) days after the last dose of IMP administration or ET. The assessments to be conducted during the trial are summarized in Table 1.3-1 (Parts 1 and 2) and Table 1.3-2 (Part 3).  8.1 Efficacy Assessments Not applicable. 8.2 Pharmacokinetic Assessments 8.2.1 Pharmacokinetic Blood/Plasma Samples In Part 1, blood samples for PK analysis will be collected at the time points as shown in Table 1.3-1. These samples should be collected within ± 3 minutes of the nominal time. Predose samples should be collected within 60 minutes before administration of the IMP. When vital signs are scheduled at the same nominal time as PK sample collections, vital signs should be measured prior to sample collection. The actual date and time of the PK sample collection will be recorded in the eCRF. After processing into plasma, aliquots will be placed into appropriately labeled tubes and will be placed in a freezer set at −70°C, unless otherwise instructed in the trial-specific operations/laboratory manual. Metabolites that are not identified in the protocol may also be analyzed, if needed. In addition, PK samples may be used for the investigation of a bioanalytical method, if needed. All PK samples will be shipped to the bioanalytical laboratory. Additional information will be provided in the trial-specific operations/laboratory manual. 8.3 Biomarker Assessments 8.3.1 Pharmacodynamic Laboratory Tests Urine samples will be collected at time intervals as shown in Table 1.3-1 for Parts 1 and 2. Subjects will be asked to void within 15 minutes prior to dosing with “dosing” times on Day -1 being the planned times of actual IMP dosing on Day 1; the sample can be discarded. Subjects will be asked for a urine sample within 15 minutes of the end of each collection interval. Multiple voids within a collection interval should be pooled and kept refrigerated (2ºC to 8ºC) or on wet ice until the end of the interval. At the end of the interval, after pooling the last collection, the volume should be determined, recorded and an aliquot taken for urine osmolality assessment. If a subject cannot produce a urine sample during a collection interval prior to 16 hours, a value of ‘0’ will be recorded for volume. A urine sample must be collected for the 16-24-hour interval. The pooled volume per collection interval per subject will be recorded (mL as integers) in the eCRF. Also, the date and time of each nominal interval will be recorded in the eCRF.  Urine osmolality will be assessed at the times presented in the schedule of assessments (Table 1.3-1) and processed in accordance with directions from the analytical laboratory. 8.3.2 Exploratory Biomarker Assessments Not applicable. 8.4 Pharmacogenomic Assessments Not applicable. 8.5 Future Biospecimen Research Samples In Part 1, future biospecimen samples will be collected at the time points described in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 1.3-1). 8.5.1 Scope of Future Biospecimen Research Future Biospecimen Research (FBR) samples will be collected from subjects who consent to this sample collection. Research performed on these samples may include genetic analyses (deoxyribonucleic acid [DNA]), gene expression profiling (ribonucleic acid [RNA]), proteomics, metabolomics, and/or the measurement of other analytes. Such research is for biomarker testing to address emergent questions not described elsewhere in the protocol (as part of the main trial) and will only be conducted on specimens from subjects who have provided appropriate consent. The maximum retention time for these samples will be 50 years. The objective of collecting specimens for FBR is to explore and identify biomarkers that inform the scientific understanding of diseases and/or their therapeutic treatments. Further details on the collection, use, and storage of FBR samples are provided below and in the trial-specific operations/laboratory manual. 8.5.2 Summary of Procedures for Future Biospecimen Research Samples All subjects enrolled in the clinical trial will be considered for enrollment in the optional FBR substudy. After obtaining informed consent, the following FBR specimens will be obtained: • Blood (2.5 mL, PAXgene® tubes with preservative) for RNA analysis • Blood (2 mL, dipotassium ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid [K2EDTA]) for genomic analysis (includes both DNA and RNA) • Blood (2 mL, K2EDTA) for plasma, for measurement of proteins, sugars, and other molecules • Urine (taken as an aliquot from the Uosm collection) for measurement of cells, proteins, sugars, and other molecules  If a subject consent to FBR collection, back-up PK samples may be used for FBR. The date (and time) of the sample collection will be recorded in the eCRF. Additional information will be provided in the trial-specific operations/laboratory manual. If an FBR sub-study is planned, a separate document describing the analysis may be prepared and the results may be reported separately from the clinical study report. 8.6 Safety Assessments Details pertaining to the definitions, collection, reporting, and follow-up of AEs are described in Section 8.7. 8.6.1 Clinical Laboratory Assessments Clinical laboratory samples will be collected at the time points described in the schedule of assessments (Table 1.3-1 for Parts 1 and 2; Table 1.3-2 for Part 3) to perform the clinical laboratory assessments described in Section 10.2. Refer to the trial-specific laboratory manual for information on how to identify laboratory values outside of normal reference ranges and for instructions on how to assess for potential clinical significance. The total volume of blood to be collected during the trial will be documented in the ICF. 8.6.2 Physical Examination Physical examinations will be performed at the time points described in the schedule of assessments (Table 1.3-1 for Parts 1 and 2; Table 1.3-2 for Part 3). The physical examination will include an evaluation of the following body systems: head, ears, eyes, nose, and throat; thorax; abdomen; urogenital; extremities; neurological; and skin and mucosae. The principal investigator (PI) or appointed physician is primarily responsible for performing the physical examination. Whenever possible, the same individual should perform all physical examinations for each subject. If the appointed designee is to perform the physical examination, he/she must be permitted by local regulations and his/her name must be included on the FDA Form 1572. Any clinically significant condition present at the post-treatment physical examination that was not present at the baseline examination should be documented as an AE and followed to a satisfactory conclusion. 8.6.3 Vital Signs Vital signs will be collected prior to IMP administration at the time points described in the schedule of assessments (Table 1.3-1 for Parts 1 and 2; Table 1.3-2 for Part 3).  Vital signs (including blood pressure, heart rate, temperature, and respiratory rate) will be assessed after the subject has been supine and at rest for  3 minutes. Vital signs will be obtained prior to the PK blood draw at the nominal timepoints, where applicable. Subjects’ vital signs should be monitored and assessed for potential clinical significance. Refer to the trial-specific operations manual for the criteria for identifying vital sign measurements outside of normal reference ranges. 8.6.4 Electrocardiogram Electrocardiograms will be performed at the time points described in the schedule of assessments (Table 1.3-1 for Parts 1 and 2; Table 1.3-2 for Part 3) and should be performed prior to blood sample collection. Twelve-lead ECGs will be recorded with the subject supine and at rest (for at least 10 minutes). Heart rate, PR interval, RR interval, QRS duration, QT interval, and corrected QT interval will be recorded. Safety ECGs will be performed prior to blood sample collection. The principal investigator or licensed physician delegated to do so must review, sign, and date each ECG reading. The reviewer must be listed on the FDA Form 1572 and the site delegation of responsibility form. Electrocardiogram data will be recorded in the case report form (CRF). Subjects’ ECGs should be assessed for potential clinical significance. Refer to the trial-specific ECG manual for the criteria for identifying ECG measurements outside of normal reference ranges. 8.6.5 Other Safety Assessments 8.6.5.1 Hepatitis and HIV Screen HIV and hepatitis screens will be performed at the time point described in the schedule of assessments (Table 1.3-1 for Parts 1 and 2; Table 1.3-2 for Part 3). 8.7 Adverse Events Adverse events will be captured for all subjects from the time the ICF is signed until End of Trial. A licensed physician will perform the medical evaluations and review all of the results of the clinical laboratory determinations. 8.7.1 Definitions Trial interventions are all pre-specified IMPs intended to be administered to the subjects during the conduct of the trial.  Adverse Event: An AE is defined as any untoward medical occurrence in a clinical trial subject administered a trial intervention and which does not necessarily have a causal relationship with this intervention. Adverse events would not include information recorded as medical history at screening for pre-planned procedures for which the underlying condition was known, and no worsening occurred. An adverse reaction is any untoward and unintended response to a trial intervention related to any dose administered. A suspected adverse reaction is any AE for which there is a reasonable possibility that the trial intervention caused the AE. For the purpose of Investigational New Drug (IND) safety reporting, “reasonable possibility” means there is evidence to suggest a causal relationship between the trial intervention and the AE. Suspected adverse reaction implies a lesser degree of certainty about causality. Treatment-emergent AEs are defined as AEs with an onset date on or after the start of IMP treatment. In more detail, TEAEs are all AEs which started after the start of IMP; or if the event was continuous from baseline and was worsening, serious, IMP-related, or resulted in death, discontinuation, interruption, or reduction of IMP. A Serious Adverse Event (SAE) includes any event that results in any of the following outcomes: • Death • Life-threatening; ie, the subject was, in the opinion of the investigator, at immediate risk of death from the event as it occurred. It does not include an event that, had it occurred in a more severe form, might have caused death. • Persistent or significant incapacity/disability or substantial disruption of the ability to conduct normal life functions. • Requires inpatient hospitalization or prolongs hospitalization.  Hospitalization itself should not be reported as an SAE; whenever possible the reason for the hospitalization should be reported.  Hospitalizations or prolonged hospitalizations for social admissions (ie, those required for reasons of convenience or other nonmedical need) are not considered SAEs.  Prescheduled hospitalization to address a condition that has existed prior to the signing of the ICF should not be considered an SAE. • Congenital anomaly/birth defect. • Other medically significant events that, based upon appropriate medical judgment, may jeopardize the subject, and may require medical or surgical intervention to prevent one of the outcomes listed above, eg, allergic bronchospasm requiring intensive treatment in an emergency room or home, blood dyscrasias or convulsions  that do not result in hospitalization, or the development of drug dependency or drug abuse. Nonserious AEs are all AEs that do not meet the criteria for a “serious” AE. Adverse Events of Special Interest (AESIs): No AESIs have been identified for the IMP to be administered during this trial. Immediately Reportable Event (IRE): • Any SAE. • Any AESIs • Potential serious hepatotoxicity (see Section 8.7.6). • Any AE related to occupational exposure (eg, an investigator getting a skin rash after exposure to a medication). Non-subject AEs would not be recorded on the eCRF form but must be recorded on an IRE form to the sponsor. • Pregnancies are also defined as IREs. Although normal pregnancy is not an AE, pregnancy of a trial subject will mandate trial intervention discontinuation and pregnancy of either a subject or a subject’s partner must be reported on an IRE form and the Pregnancy Surveillance Form(s) to the sponsor. This includes pregnancy of the subject or the partner of the subject. Pregnancy will only be documented on the AE eCRF if the pregnancy occurs in a female (at birth) subject and there is an abnormality or complication (see Section 10.3). Clinical Laboratory Test Value Changes: It is the investigator’s responsibility to review the results of laboratory tests for each individual subject as they become available. This review will be documented by the investigator’s dated signature on the laboratory report. The investigator may repeat the laboratory test or request additional tests to verify the results of the original laboratory tests. If this laboratory value is considered medically relevant (ie, clinically significant) by the investigator (subject is symptomatic, requiring corrective treatment or further evaluation), or if the laboratory value leads to discontinuation, and/or fulfills a seriousness criterion, this is considered an AE. Severity: Adverse events will be graded on a 3-point scale and reported as indicated in the eCRF. The severity of an adverse experience is defined as follows: 1 = Mild: Discomfort noticed, but no disruption to daily activity. 2 = Moderate: Discomfort sufficient to reduce or affect normal daily activity. 3 = Severe: Inability to work or perform normal daily activity.  IMP Causality: Assessment of causal relationship of an AE to the use of the IMP is defined as follows: Related: There is a reasonable possibility of a temporal and causal relationship between the IMP and the AE. Not Related: There is no temporal or causal relationship between the IMP and the AE. 8.7.2 Eliciting and Reporting Adverse Events The investigator will regularly assess subjects for the occurrence of AEs. To avoid bias in eliciting AEs, subjects should be asked the nonleading question: “How have you felt since your last visit?” All AEs (serious and nonserious) reported by the subject must be recorded on the source documents and eCRF provided by the sponsor. Adverse event collection will begin after a subject signs the ICF and will continue until the end of the follow-up period. All AEs must be reported after subject informed consent has been obtained, including screening failures due to AEs, irrespective of trial intervention administration. Medical terminology should be used for AE reporting. Adverse events should be reported as a single unifying diagnosis whenever possible or, in the absence of a unifying diagnosis, as individual signs or symptoms. Exacerbation or disease progression should be reported as an AE only if there are unusual or severe clinical features that were not present, or experienced earlier, or not expected based on the course of the condition. Medical or surgical procedures (eg, endoscopy, appendectomy) should not be reported as AEs; however, the condition that led to the procedure may be reported as an AE. If a reported AE undergoes a change or worsening in severity, seriousness, or toxicity, it should be reported as a new AE in the eCRF. In addition, the sponsor must be notified immediately by telephone, fax, or e-mail of any IREs according to the procedure outlined below, in Section 8.7.3. Special attention should be paid to recording hospitalization and concomitant medications. The AE, start date, end date (if possible, start date and time, end date and time), seriousness, severity, relationship to IMP (causality), action taken with IMP, and outcome will be recorded on the source documents and in the eCRF. Note: Start time should be recorded in the event an AE such as vomiting occurs. When capturing start/end time, at a minimum, the hour should be captured in the event it is difficult to specify in hours and minutes.  Regarding SAE, relationship to, and action taken with trial intervention(s) other than IMP will also be evaluated per each intervention. These evaluations will be recorded in the source documents and in the eCRF and will be reported using the IRE form (see Section 8.7.3). 8.7.3 Immediately Reportable Events The investigator must immediately report (within 24 hours), using an IRE form, after they or site personnel become aware of any IRE (SAE, potential serious hepatotoxicity, or confirmed pregnancy), by telephone, fax, or e-mail to the sponsor or designee using the contact information on the cover page of this protocol (please note that the IRE form is NOT the AE eCRF). Patient confidentiality must be protected and contact information such as name, address, phone number or any other protected health information as determined by applicable local regulation must be redacted when forwarding Safety Information and supporting documentation. Details regarding the follow-up of IREs are included in Section 8.7.8.2. 8.7.4 Medical Device Incidents (Including Malfunctions) Not applicable. 8.7.5 Adverse Events of Special Interest Not applicable. 8.7.6 Potential Serious Hepatotoxicity For a subject who experiences an elevation in aspartate aminotransferase (AST) or alanine aminotransferase (ALT) that is  3 times the upper limit of normal (ULN), a total bilirubin level should also be evaluated. If the total bilirubin is  2 times the ULN, complete an IRE form with all values listed and report as an AE in the eCRF. 8.7.7 Procedure for Breaking the Blind This trial does not use blinding procedures. 8.7.8 Follow-up of Adverse Events 8.7.8.1 Follow-up of Nonserious Adverse Events Nonserious AEs that are identified at any time during the trial must be recorded on the AE eCRF with the current status (ongoing or resolved/recovered) noted. All nonserious events (that are not IREs) that are ongoing at the last scheduled contact will be recorded as ongoing in the eCRF. For any AE having been identified throughout the trial, or during analysis, additional relevant medical history information may be requested by the sponsor  to further ascertain causality (including, but not limited to, information such as risk-related behavior, family history, and occupation). 8.7.8.2 Follow-up of Immediately Reportable Events This trial requires that subjects be actively monitored for IREs up to 7 days after the last trial intervention is administered. Immediately reportable events that are identified or ongoing at the last scheduled contact must be recorded as such on the AE eCRF page and the IRE form. If updated information (eg, resolved status) on IRE status becomes available after a subject’s last scheduled contact (up to last in-clinic visit for the entire trial), this must be reported to the sponsor and recorded on the AE eCRF page and the IRE form, according to the appropriate reporting procedures described in Section 8.7.3. It is expected that the investigator will provide or arrange appropriate supportive care for the subject and will provide prompt updates on the subject’s status to the sponsor. The investigator will follow the IREs until: • the events are resolved, • the events have stabilized, • the subject is lost to follow-up, or • the subject has died. Resolution means that the subject has returned to the baseline state of health and stabilized means that the investigator does not expect any further improvement or worsening of the subject’s condition. The investigator will continue to report any significant follow-up information to the sponsor up to the point the event has resolved or stabilized, or the subject is lost to follow-up, or has died. Refer to Section 10.3 for additional information regarding the follow-up period for subjects that become pregnant or for pregnant partners of male subjects. 8.7.8.3 Follow-up and Reporting of Immediately Reportable Events Occurring After Last Scheduled Contact Any new IREs reported to the investigator which occur after the last scheduled contact and are determined by the investigator to be reasonably associated with the use of the trial intervention(s), should be reported to the sponsor according to the procedures outlined in Section 8.7.3. This may include IREs that are captured on follow-up telephone contact or at any other time point after the defined trial period. Any significant follow-up information should continue to be reported to the sponsor until the events are resolved or stabilized, or the subject is lost to follow-up or has died.  8.8 Treatment of Overdose For treatment of overdoses, please refer to the tolvaptan IB section for overdose.2 8.9 Subject Assessment Recording Not applicable. 8.10 Other Assessments Not applicable. 9 Statistical Considerations 9.1 Sample Size 9.1.1 Parts 1 and 2 (Bioequivalence) Part 1 pilot bioequivalence: The sample size was chosen to provide sufficient number of subjects with dense PK and PD sampling to provide variability assessment for powering definitive bioequivalence assessment in healthy subjects and inform subject numbers in Part 2. Part 2 pivotal bioequivalence: Sample size will be based on point estimates of geometric mean ratios (GMRs) of the primary endpoints and the coefficient of variation (COV) of the parameters. Sample size will have 80% power to reject both the null hypothesis that the ratio of the ER to IR parameters is outside either the 0.8 or 1.25 interval, depending on the parameters. 9.1.2 Part 3: (Food Effect) Based on a previous food effect trial (Trial 156-07-262) where a high-fat meal produced an approximate 1.2-fold increase in tolvaptan AUC∞, a determination of bioequivalence will not be used for determining the sample size of the food effect comparison. Instead, a sample size of 12 was chosen based on the recommended minimum number of subjects to be used. Fourteen subjects will be enrolled to avoid having to replace subjects at a later date. It is expected that at least 12 subjects will complete the trial. 9.2 Datasets for Analysis The PK parameter dataset will consist of subjects with valid measurements only (per clinical pharmacology). The safety dataset will consist of all subjects that were administered at least one treatment of IMP.  9.3 Handling of Missing Data for Primary and Secondary Endpoint Analysis Both the PK and safety analyses will be based actual collected data no imputation will be made for missing data in this trial. The handling of concentrations below the lower limit of quantitation will be according to the sponsor’s data handling processes. 9.4 Statistical Analyses Unless specified, the same analyses will be applied to Parts 1, 2, and 3 of the study. 9.4.1 Primary Endpoint Analysis The statistical analyses will follow the principles for establishing average bioequivalence given in the FDA Guidance on statistical approaches for establishing bioequivalence between a test and reference formulation and to establish the bioequivalence of 2 treatments.1 An analysis of variance will be performed on the natural-log transformed PK parameters using the MIXED procedure in SAS. The mixed-effects linear model for each parameter will include sequence, treatment, and period as fixed effects, and a term for subjects as a random effect. From each analysis, least squares means, their difference, and the 90% confidence interval (CI) for their difference will be derived. Then, the anti-logs of the difference and the confidence limits will provide the estimate and 90% CI for the ratio of the geometric means of the 2 dosage strengths or the 2 treatments (fed and fasted). For Parts 1 and 2, the following criteria for PK and Uosm are recommended to bridge the ER and IR formulations to be applied at both dose levels (ER 90 mg vs IR 90/30 mg, and ER 45 mg vs IR 45/15 mg). • Lower bound of 90% CI of GMR for tolvaptan C24h ≥ 0.8 • Upper bound of 90% CI of GMR for tolvaptan Cmax ≤ 1.25 • Lower bound of 90% CI of GMR for AUC0-24h of Uosm change from baseline ≥ 0.8 • Upper bound of 90% CI of GMR for AUC0-24h of on-treatment Uosm ≤ 1.25 Non-inferiority of ER vs IR will be established if lower bounds of 90% CI of GMR for C24h and AUC0-24h of Uosm are ≥ 0.8 and upper bounds of 90% CI of GMR for Cmax and AUC0-24h of on-treatment Uosm are ≤ 1.25.  Only subjects that have PK or Uosm parameters determined for both treatments will be included in the analysis. 9.4.2 Safety Analyses 9.4.2.1 Adverse Events All AEs will be coded by system organ class and Medical Dictionary for Regulatory Activities preferred term. The incidence of the following events will be summarized by treatment group: • TEAEs • TEAEs by severity • TEAEs with an outcome of death • Serious TEAEs • TEAEs leading to discontinuation of the IMP The same summaries will be prepared for TEAEs causally related to the IMP. 9.4.2.2 Clinical Laboratory Data Summary statistics for the clinical laboratory parameters at baseline, postdose time points, and mean changes from baseline will be presented. The incidence of potentially clinically significant laboratory test abnormalities will be summarized. Shift tables will be produced assessing status (low, normal, high) changes from baseline. According to FDA Guidance, laboratory measurements that signal the potential for drug-induced liver injury will be reported. An incidence table and a listing will be provided for subjects who meet one or combinations of following criteria: 1) ALT or AST  3 ULN (or baseline value for subjects with abnormal baseline) 2) Increase in bilirubin  2 ULN (or baseline value for subjects with abnormal baseline) 9.4.2.3 Physical Examination and Vital Signs Data By-subject listings will be provided for physical examinations. Summary statistics for changes from baseline in vital signs will be provided. Potentially clinically significant results in vital signs will also be summarized. 9.4.2.4 Electrocardiogram Data Electrocardiogram data will be collected prior to IMP administration and will be listed.  9.4.3 Other Analyses 9.4.3.1 Analysis of Demographics and Baseline Characteristics Demographics and baseline characteristics (age, sex, race, and ethnicity, weight, height, and BMI) will be summarized by descriptive statistics eg, proportion, mean, median, SD, minimum, and maximum values. 9.4.3.2 Pharmacokinetic Analysis Tolvaptan plasma concentrations will be summarized using descriptive statistics (mean, median, standard deviation, percentage coefficient of variation [%CV], minimum, maximum) by timepoint and treatment. Non-compartmental PK analysis will be performed to estimate the PK parameters. Values of Cmax, time to maximum (peak) plasma concentration (tmax), AUCt, AUC∞, C24h, apparent clearance of drug from plasma after extravascular administration (CL/F) and body weight normalized CL/F are planned. Other parameters, including those for metabolites, may be reported depending on the concentration data collected. Pharmacokinetic parameters will be summarized by treatment using the same descriptive statistics as for concentrations plus geometric mean. Values of tmax will be summarized by median, minimum, and maximum. 9.4.3.3 Pharmacodynamic Analysis Urine osmolality will be summarized using descriptive statistics (mean, median, standard deviation, percentage coefficient of variation [%CV], minimum, maximum) by collection interval and treatment. Urine volumes will be similarly summarized with the addition of 0–24-hour volumes. AUC0-24h of Uosm will be determined by summing the Uosm × collection interval duration (h) for each interval over the 24-hour interval. If no urine is collected in an interval, the Uosm value for the following interval will be multiplied by the combined duration of the 2 intervals. 9.5 Interim Analysis No interim analysis or adaptive design are applicable. 9.6 Final Analysis A final database lock will be completed following completion of Parts 1, 2, and 3 of the study. A snapshot of the database will be taken after each part is completed, or at ET. The analyses will be conducted for each part separately.  10 Supporting Documentation and Operational Considerations  10.1 Appendix 1: Regulatory, Ethical, and Trial Oversight Considerations 10.1.1 Ethics and Responsibility This trial must be conducted in compliance with the protocol, FDA regulationsapplicable International Council for Harmonisation (ICH) GCP guidance, international ethical principles derived from the Declaration of Helsinki and Council for International Organizations of Medical Science (CIOMS) guidelines, and applicable local laws and regulations. Each trial site will seek approval/favorable opinion by an IRB according to regional requirements, and the investigator will provide that documentation to the sponsor. The IRB will evaluate the ethical, scientific, and medical appropriateness of the trial. Further, in preparing and handling the eCRF, IRE and any safety information, the investigator, subinvestigator, and their staff will take measures to ensure adequate care in protecting subject privacy. To this end, a subject ID will be used to identify each subject. Financial aspects, subject insurance, and the publication policy for the trial will be documented in the agreement between the sponsor and the investigator. 10.1.2 Informed Consent Informed consent will be freely obtained from all subjects (or their guardian or legally acceptable representative, as applicable for local laws). The informed consent form (ICF) will be approved by the same IRB that approves this protocol. Each ICF will comply with the ICH GCP Guidelines, and local regulatory requirements. The investigator will ensure that the sponsor reviews and authorizes any written site- specific ICF used in the trial before submission to the IRB. In support of the site’s standard process for administering informed consent, this trial will also allow for eICF as a tool within applicable regions and trial sites. The eICF utilizes the IRB-approved site- specific ICF to offer subjects an enhanced platform to review and understand their rights as a research subject as well as required trial procedures. When possible, trial sites will have subjects review and sign the eICF prior to starting any trial procedures; however, if local regulations do not allow for use of the electronic format, subjects may continue in the trial utilizing the standard paper and wet ink signature process. Investigators may discuss trial availability and the possibility for entry with a potential subject without first obtaining consent. However, informed consent must be obtained and documented before initiation of any procedures that are performed solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for this trial, including withdrawal from current medication(s).  Potential subjects are free to refuse entry into the trial, or withdraw from the trial at any time, without justification, and there will be no consequences to their further care. Prospective trial subjects will be provided with controlled access to the eICF application by trial site staff. When the trial site staff and the subject agree that the subject has enough information to make an informed decision to participate, the subject will electronically sign in the eICF application, and an electronic date and timestamp will be applied to the signature. The subject will be given a printed, signed copy of the ICF. Any other parties required by the IRB (trial site staff, witnesses, or legally authorized representative) are also required to sign electronically and these signatures will be stored with the eICF in accordance with the ICH GCP Guideline and local regulatory requirements/guidelines. These signatures cannot be altered, removed, or copied. Once appropriate essential information has been provided and fully explained in layman’s language to the subject by the investigator (or a qualified designee), and it has been documented that the subject has had the opportunity to ask questions, the IRB-approved written ICF will be signed and dated by both the subject and the person obtaining consent (investigator or designee), as well as by any other parties required by the IRB. The subject will receive a copy of the signed ICF; the original shall be kept on file by the investigator. Subjects may be asked to sign additional ICFs if the protocol is amended and the changes to the protocol result in additional information that needs to be provided to the subjects, so that they can make a knowledgeable and voluntary decision on continued trial participation. Partners of male subjects who become pregnant during the course of the trial may be asked to sign additional ICFs in order to collect additional information regarding the nonsubject partner and fetus. A separate and similar consent process will be followed for the optional blood samples for future biospecimen research. Consent must be obtained before the blood sample is collected. 10.1.3 Recruitment Strategy Methods for subject recruitment include, but are not limited to media (ie, television, radio, and newspaper), physician referrals, press releases, fliers, random mailings, cold calls, and the internet (ie, social media). Methods will be selected before study start. 10.1.4 Confidentiality All information generated in this trial will be considered confidential and will not be disclosed to anyone not directly concerned with the trial without the sponsor’s prior  written permission. Subject confidentiality requirements of the region(s) where the trial is conducted will be met. However, authorized regulatory officials and sponsor personnel (or their representatives) may be allowed full access to inspect and copy the records, consistent with local requirements. All trial intervention(s), subject bodily fluids, and/or other materials collected shall be used solely in accordance with this protocol, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the sponsor. Subjects will be identified only by unique subject ID in the eCRF. If further subject identification is required, subjects’ full names may be made known to a regulatory agency or other authorized officials, if necessary, subject to local regulations. 10.1.5 Quality Control and Quality Assurance 10.1.5.1 Monitoring The sponsor has ethical, legal, and scientific obligations to follow this trial in accordance with established research principles, the applicable ICH GCP guidance, and applicable regulatory requirements and local laws. As part of a concerted effort to fulfill these obligations (maintain current personal knowledge of the progress of the trial), the sponsor’s monitors will visit the site during the trial, as well as communicate frequently via telephone, e-mail, and written communications. In addition, all investigators and trial site personnel will undergo initial and ongoing training for this particular trial, and this training will be clearly documented. 10.1.5.2 Auditing The sponsor’s Quality Assurance Unit (or representative) may conduct trial site audits. Audits will include, but are not limited to, trial intervention supply, presence of required documents, the informed consent process, site operations, delegation of authority and training, and a review of the eCRF with source documents, as applicable. The investigator will agree to cooperate and participate with audits. Regulatory authorities may inspect the investigator site during or after the trial. The investigator will cooperate with such inspections and will contact the sponsor immediately if such an inspection occurs. 10.1.6 Protocol Deviations In the event of a significant/major deviation from the protocol due to an emergency, accident, or mistake (eg, violation of informed consent process, trial intervention dispensing or subject dosing error, treatment assignment error, subject enrolled in violation of eligibility criteria or concomitant medication criteria), the investigator or designee will contact the sponsor or designee at the earliest possible time by telephone or  via e-mail. The investigator and sponsor (or designee) will come as quickly as possible to a joint decision regarding the subject’s continuation in the trial. This decision will be documented by the investigator and the sponsor (or designee) and reviewed by the site monitor. Any major protocol deviation will be recorded in the eCRF along with the start date and details of the deviation. 10.1.7 Records Management 10.1.7.1 Source Documents Source documents are defined as the results of original observations and activities of a clinical investigation. Source documents will include but are not limited to medical records, electronic data, screening logs, progress notes, paper-based assessments and scales, and recorded data from automated instruments or applications. All source documents pertaining to this trial will be maintained by the investigators and made available for direct inspection by authorized persons. Investigator(s)/institution(s) will permit trial-related monitoring, audits, IRB review, and regulatory inspection(s) by providing direct access to source data/documents by authorized persons as defined in the ICF. In all cases, subject confidentiality must be maintained in accordance with local regulatory requirements. 10.1.7.2 Data Collection During each subject’s visit to the site, an investigator or their designee participating in the trial will record information to document all significant observations. At a minimum, these notes will contain: • Documentation of the informed consent process, including any revised ICFs; • Documentation of the investigator’s decision to enroll the subject into the trial, the review of all inclusion/exclusion criteria prior to trial intervention administration, and confirmation of the subject’s actual participation in the trial; • Documentation of baseline and demographic characteristics (eg, age, weight, BMI, sex, race, ethnicity) • The date of the visit and the corresponding Visit or Day in the trial schedule; • General subject status remarks, including any significant medical findings. The severity, frequency, duration, action taken, and outcome of any AEs and the investigator’s assessment of relationship to trial intervention must also be recorded; • Any changes in concomitant medications or dosages; • A general reference to the procedures completed, including dosing and trial intervention compliance;  • The signature (or initials) and date of the investigator (or designee) who made an entry in the medical record. In addition, any contact with the subject via telephone or other means that provides significant clinical information will also be documented in the progress notes as described above. Information from medical records and other source documents will be entered by investigative site personnel onto eCRFs in the sponsor’s electronic data capture (EDC) system that is 21 CRF Part 11 compliant. Changes to the data will be captured by an automatic audit trail in the EDC system. Electronic data not entered on eCRF, such as data received from central laboratories and central ECG readers, will be reconciled using key data fields by the sponsor or the CRO with the eCRF data to ensure consistency. Source documents and source data will be captured electronically (where permitted by local regulation) in this trial and will meet the same fundamental elements of data quality (eg, attributable, legible, contemporaneous, original, accurate, and complete) as paper records. These data will be collected into a system that is fully validated according to 21 CFR Part 11. Changes to the data will be captured by an automatic audit trail. Designated trial site staff will not be given access to the electronic source system until they have been appropriately trained. Information to be originally captured and reviewed electronically shall include details of the subject visit and the protocol required assessments performed as a part of these visits, medical history, AEs, and concomitant medications. Because this trial is using an electronic source record as the original point of data capture, there is no additional data entry step for the trial site for data collected directly into the application, rather, the electronic source record directly populates the trial database. Some data may be captured via paper and then entered into the eSource system. These and any other data treated in this manner will be source data verified per the monitoring plan and the location of the source data (ie, eSource, paper, or a local electronic system) will be documented before the trial start. Any changes to information in paper source documents will be initialed and dated on the day the change is made by a trial site staff member authorized to make the change. Changes will be made by striking a single line through erroneous data (so as not to obliterate the original data), and clearly entering the correct data (eg, wrong data right data). If the reason for the change is not apparent, a brief explanation for the change will be written in the source documentation by the investigator or their designee.  Another exception will be safety laboratory [or central ECG data], where the official source documentation will be considered the report issued by the analyzing laboratory. Remote monitoring of the original electronic source records will take place; however, on-site monitoring inspections will continue to take place in order to review data entry of source documentation directly captured on paper and transcribed into the system, to ensure protocol adherence, to assess trial site operational capabilities and to perform other monitoring activities that cannot be performed remotely. At the end of the trial, the investigator must certify that the data entered into the eSource application are complete and accurate. After database lock, the investigator will receive an electronic copy of the subject data. 10.1.7.3 File Management at the Trial Site The investigator will ensure that the trial site file is maintained in accordance with applicable ICH GCP guidance and as required by applicable local regulations. The investigator/institution will take measures to prevent accidental or premature destruction of these documents. 10.1.7.4 Records Retention at the Trial Site The FDA regulations require all investigators participating in clinical drug trials to maintain detailed clinical data for one of the following periods: • A period of at least 2 years after the date on which a New Drug Application is approved by the FDA • A period of 2 years after the sponsor has notified the FDA that investigation with this drug is discontinued The investigator must not dispose of any records relevant to this trial without either (1) written permission from the sponsor or (2) provision of an opportunity for the sponsor to collect such records. The investigator will be responsible to maintain adequate and accurate electronic or hard copy source documents of all observations and data generated during this trial including any data clarification forms received from the sponsor. Such documentation is subject to inspection by the sponsor and relevant regulatory authorities. If the investigator withdraws from the trial (eg, due to relocation or retirement), all trial-related records should be transferred to a mutually agreed-upon designee within a sponsor-specified timeframe. Notice of such transfer will be given to the sponsor in writing. 10.1.7.5 Dissemination of Clinical Trial Data Clinical trial data will be released in accordance with required disclosure rules and regulations. For clinical trials registered on clinicltrials.gov, results will be disclosed  within 12 months of last patient last visit (LPLV) unless other deferral requirements can be met at the time of required disclosure. In that case, the clinical trials results will be deferred for the maximum amount of time of 2 years from 12 months past LPLV. 10.1.7.6 Publication Authorship Requirements Authorship for any Otsuka-sponsored publications resulting from the conduct of this trial will be based on International Committee of Medical Journal Editors (ICMJE) authorship criteria (http://www.icmje.org/recommendations). According to ICMJE guidelines, one may be considered an author only if the following criteria are met: 1) Substantial contributions to the conception or design of the work; or the acquisition, analysis, or interpretation of data for the work; AND 2) Drafting the work or revising it critically for important intellectual content; AND 3) Final approval of the version to be published; AND 4) Agreement to be accountable for all aspects of the work in ensuring that questions related to the accuracy or integrity of any part of the work are appropriately investigated and resolved. All authors must meet the above criteria, and all who qualify for authorship based on the above criteria should be listed as authors. Investigators or other personnel involved in the conduct of the trial who do not qualify for authorship may be acknowledged in publications resulting from the trial. By agreeing to participate in the trial, investigators or other personnel involved in the conduct of the trial consent to such acknowledgement in any publications resulting from its conduct.  10.2 Appendix 2: Clinical Laboratory Tests The tests detailed in Table 10.2-1 will be performed. Table 10.2-1 Clinical Laboratory Assessments Hematology: Hemoglobin Hematocrit Mean corpuscular hemoglobin concentration Mean corpuscular volume RBC count WBC count (absolute and differential) Platelets Urinalysis: Specimen appearance Color Occult blood Glucose Microscopic analysis, if indicated, WBC/RBC counts per high powered field pH Protein Specific gravity Serum Chemistry: Alkaline phosphatase Alanine aminotransferase Aspartate aminotransferase Bilirubin BUN Calcium Cholesterol Creatinine Gamma glutamyl transferase Glucose Lactate dehydrogenase Potassium Protein Sodium Triglycerides Additional Tests: Urine pregnancy for persons of childbearing potentiala Serology Urine drug screen BUN = Blood urea nitrogen; RBC = Red blood cell; WBC = White blood cell. aSerum pregnancy test to be taken to confirm a positive urine pregnancy test. In addition, the pharmacodynamic laboratory tests for urine osmolality will be performed.  10.3 Appendix 3: Contraceptive Guidance and Collection of Pregnancy Information Persons of childbearing potential (POCBP) are females at birth whose menstruation has started and who are not documented as sterile (eg, have had a bilateral oophorectomy, or hysterectomy, or who have been postmenopausal for at least 12 months). Persons of non-childbearing potential do not meet definition of POCBP. For sexually active subjects or POCBP, there must be a documented agreement that the subject and their partner will take effective measures (ie, 2 different approved methods of birth control or remain abstinent) to prevent pregnancy during the course of the trial and for 30 days after the last trial intervention administration (for females at birth). Unless the subject is sterile (ie, persons who have had a bilateral oophorectomy, have had a hysterectomy, or have been postmenopausal for at least 12 consecutive months; or persons who have had a bilateral orchiectomy) or remains abstinent during the trial and for 30 days after the last trial intervention, 2 of the following approved methods of birth control must be used: vasectomy, tubal ligation, intrauterine device, birth control pill, birth control implant, birth control depot injection, birth control patch, condom with spermicide, sponge with spermicide, or occlusive cap (vaginal diaphragm or cervical/vault cap) with spermicide. Any single method of birth control, including vasectomy and tubal ligation, may fail, leading to pregnancy. The contraceptive method will be documented in the eCRF or source document. Subjects must also agree not to donate sperm or eggs from trial screening through 30 days after the last trial intervention administration. Before enrolling subjects in this clinical trial, investigators must review the following information about trial participation as part of the ICF process. The topics should generally include: • General information • Informed consent form • Pregnancy prevention information • Drug interactions with hormonal contraceptives • Contraceptives in current use • Follow-up of a reported pregnancy Before trial enrollment, POCBP and their partners must be advised of the importance of avoiding pregnancy during trial participation and the potential risk factors for an unintentional pregnancy. Subjects must sign the ICF confirming that the above-mentioned risk factors and the consequences were discussed.  A urine or serum pregnancy test for human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) will be performed at screening and at check-in to the inpatient facility on all POCBP. If a urine test is performed and is positive, the investigator will follow-up with a confirmatory serum test. During the trial, all POCBP should be instructed to contact the investigator immediately if they suspect they might be pregnant (eg, missed or late menstrual cycle). Male subjects must be instructed to contact the investigator immediately, during the trial, if their partner suspects that they might be pregnant (eg, missed or late menstrual cycle). If a subject is suspected to be pregnant before she receives trial intervention(s), the intervention administration must be withheld until the results of serum pregnancy tests are available. If the pregnancy is confirmed, the subject must not receive the trial intervention(s) and must not be enrolled in the trial. If pregnancy is suspected while the subject is taking trial intervention(s), the intervention(s) must be withheld immediately (if reasonable, taking into consideration any potential withdrawal risks) until the result of the pregnancy test is known. If pregnancy is confirmed, the trial intervention(s) will be permanently discontinued in an appropriate manner (eg, dose tapering if necessary for subject safety) and the subject will be withdrawn from the trial. Exceptions to trial discontinuation may be considered for life-threatening conditions only after consultations with the IRE contact (see the title page of this protocol for contact information). The investigator must immediately notify the sponsor (within 24 hours) of any pregnancy associated with trial intervention exposure during the trial and for at least 30 days after the last trial intervention administration and record the event on the IRE form and forward it to the sponsor. The sponsor will forward the Pregnancy Surveillance Form(s) to the investigator for monitoring the outcome of the pregnancy. Protocol required procedures for trial discontinuation and follow-up must be performed on the subject unless contraindicated by pregnancy (eg, x-ray studies). Other appropriate pregnancy follow-up procedures should be considered if indicated. In addition, the investigator must report to the sponsor, on the Pregnancy Surveillance Form(s), follow-up information regarding the course of the pregnancy, including perinatal and neonatal outcome. Infants will be followed for a minimum of 6 months from the date of birth.  10.4 Appendix 4: Protocol Amendments The investigator will not make any changes to this protocol without the sponsor’s prior written consent and subsequent approval/favorable opinion by the IRB. Any permanent change to the protocol, whether an overall change or a change for specific trial site(s), must be handled as a protocol amendment. Any amendment will be written by the sponsor. Each amendment will be submitted to the IRB, as required by local regulations. Except for “administrative” or “non-substantial” amendments, investigators will wait for IRB approval/favorable opinion of the amended protocol before implementing the change(s). Non-substantial amendments are defined as having no effect on the safety of subjects, conduct or management of the trial, trial design, or the quality or safety of intervention(s) used in the trial. A protocol change intended to eliminate an apparent immediate hazard to subjects should be implemented immediately after agreement by the sponsor and investigator, followed by IRB notification within local applicable timelines. The sponsor will submit protocol amendments to the applicable regulatory agencies within local applicable timelines. When the IRB, investigators, and/or the sponsor conclude that the protocol amendment substantially alters the trial design and/or increases the potential risk to the subject, the currently approved written ICF will require similar modification. In such cases, after approval/favorable opinion of the new ICF by the IRB, repeat written informed consent will be obtained from currently enrolled subjects in the trial before the amendment-specified changes in the trial are implemented.  10.4.1 Protocol Amendment(s) Not applicable.  